Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-133
Hotels; cabs; runners for; licensing and regulation.

A second-class city shall have power to license, tax, and regulate runners for stages, cars, hotels, public buildings or other things or persons.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5027;

C.S.1922, § 4196;

C.S.1929, § 17-135;

R.S.1943, § 17-133.